Wisconsin, session 2025, SB360.
do enact as follows:SB360,15Section 1. 23.50 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB360,2,11623.50 (1) The procedure in ss. 23.50 to 23.85 applies to all actions in circuit 1court to recover forfeitures, plus costs, fees, and surcharges imposed under ch. 814, 2for violations of ss. 77.09, 90.21, 134.60, 167.10 (3), 167.31 (2), 281.48 (2) to (5), 3283.33, 285.57 (2), 285.59 (2), (3) (c) and (4), 287.07, 287.08, 287.81, 287.83, and 4299.64 (2), subch. VI of ch. 77, this chapter, and chs. 26 to 31, ch. 169, and ch. 350, 5and any administrative rules promulgated thereunder, violations specified under s. 6280.98 (2) or 285.86, violations of s. 281.36 if the department chooses to proceed 7under s. 281.36 (14) (f), violations of ch. 951 if the animal involved is a captive wild 8animal, violations of rules of the Kickapoo reserve management board under s. 941.41 (7) (k), violations to which s. 299.85 (7) (a) 2. or 4. applies, or violations of local 10ordinances enacted by any local authority in accordance with s. 23.33 (11) (am), 1123.335 (21) (a), or 30.77.SB360,212Section 2. 23.65 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB360,2,191323.65 (1) When it appears to the district attorney that a violation of s. 90.21, 14134.60, 281.36, 281.48 (2) to (5), 283.33, 285.57 (2), 285.59 (2), (3) (c) and (4), 287.07, 15287.08, 287.81, 287.83, or 299.64 (2), this chapter or ch. 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 169, or 16350, or any administrative rule promulgated pursuant thereto, a violation specified 17under s. 285.86, or a violation of ch. 951, if the animal involved is a captive wild 18animal, has been committed the district attorney may proceed by complaint and 19summons.SB360,320Section 3. 287.83 of the statutes is created to read:SB360,2,2321287.83 Limit on releasing balloons. (1) In this section, “balloon” means a 22flexible, nonporous bag made of biaxially oriented polyethylene terephthalate that 23is capable of being inflated with gas.SB360,3,31(2) No person may knowingly and willfully release, or cause to be released, 2into the atmosphere 10 or more balloons inflated with a gas that has a density lower 3than normal atmospheric gases.SB360,3,44(3) Subsection (2) does not apply to any of the following:SB360,3,65(a) Balloons that are released and remain indoors, if the property owner or 6lease holder authorizes the release.SB360,3,77(b) Balloons released for scientific or meteorological purposes.SB360,3,98(c) Balloons released by or on behalf of any government agency or pursuant to 9a government contract for scientific or meteorological purposes.SB360,3,1110(4) The department may promulgate rules necessary to implement this 11section.SB360,412Section 4. 287.91 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB360,3,1513287.91 (1) The attorney general shall enforce this chapter except for ss. 14287.07, 287.08 and, 287.81, and 287.83 and all rules promulgated under this 15chapter except under those sections.SB360,516Section 5. 287.97 of the statutes is renumbered 287.97 (1) and amended to 17read:SB360,3,2118287.97 (1) Any person who violates this chapter, except s. 287.07, 287.08, 19287.17, or 287.81, or 287.83, or any rule promulgated under this chapter, except 20under s. 287.07, 287.08 or, 287.81, or 287.83, may be required to forfeit not less than 21$10 nor more than $1,000 for each violation.SB360,622Section 6. 287.97 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB360,4,21287.97 (2) Any person who violates s. 287.83 or any rule promulgated under s. 2287.83 may be required to forfeit not less than $500 for each violation.SB360,4,33